District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.18

Application of subchapter — Annuities from other governments.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to any teacher who receives an annuity from any state or municipality other than the District of Columbia.

History

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 390, ch. 39, § 18
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 731, ch. 556, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1218.
1973 Ed., § 31-719.